test/src/morphology/N-ress_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ress a-stem: # Noun 'switch/risu' - full paradigm
     ress+N+Sg+Nom: ress
     ress+N+Sg+Gen: reess
     ress+N+Sg+Acc: reess
     ress+N+Sg+Ill: rissu
     ress+N+Sg+Loc: reessast
     ress+N+Sg+Com: reessain
     ress+N+Ess: ressan
     ress+N+Par: ressad
     ress+N+Sg+Abe: reesstää
     ress+N+Pl+Nom: reess
     ress+N+Pl+Gen: reessai
     ress+N+Pl+Acc: reessaid
     ress+N+Pl+Ill: reessaid
     ress+N+Pl+Loc: reessain
     ress+N+Pl+Com: reessaivuiˊm
     ress+N+Pl+Abe: reessaitää
